California statutes. Probate Code
(B) Determine, to the extent practicable or possible, whether the court investigator believes the proposed conservatee suffers from any of the mental function deficits listed in subdivision (a) of Section 811 that significantly impairs the proposed conservatee’s ability to understand and appreciate the consequences of the proposed conservatee’s actions in connection with any of the functions described in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 1801 and describe the observations that support that belief, including information in the medical reports received pursuant to paragraph (9).

(5) Determine if the proposed conservatee wishes to oppose the
 establishment of the conservatorship.

(6) Determine if the proposed conservatee objects to the proposed conservator or prefers another person to act as conservator.

(7) Determine if the proposed conservatee wishes to be represented by legal counsel and, if so, whether the proposed conservatee has retained legal counsel and, if not, whether the proposed conservatee plans to retain legal counsel.

(8) (A) Determine if the proposed conservatee is incapable of communicating, with or without reasonable accommodations, a desire to participate in the voting process, and may be disqualified from voting pursuant to Section 2208 of the Elections Code.

(B) The proposed conservatee shall not be disqualified from voting on the basis that the proposed conservatee does, or would need to do, any of the following to complete an affidavit of voter registration:

(i) Signs the affidavit of voter registration with a mark or a cross pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2150 of the Elections Code.

(ii) Signs the affidavit of voter registration by means of a signature stamp pursuant to Section 354.5 of the Elections Code.

(iii) Completes the affidavit of voter registration with the assistance of another person pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2150 of the Elections Code.

(iv) Completes the affidavit of voter
 registration with reasonable accommodations.

(9) Gather and review relevant medical reports regarding the proposed conservatee from the proposed conservatee’s primary care physician and other relevant mental and physical health care providers.

(10) Report to the court in writing, at least five days before the hearing, concerning all of the foregoing, including the proposed conservatee’s express communications concerning both of the following:

(A) Representation by legal counsel.

(B) If the proposed conservatee is not willing to attend the hearing, does not wish to contest the establishment of the conservatorship, and does not object to the proposed
 conservator or prefers that another person act as conservator.

(11) Deliver pursuant to Section 1215, at least five days before the hearing, a copy of the report referred to in paragraph (10) to all of the following:

(A) The attorney, if any, for the petitioner.

(B) The attorney, if any, for the proposed conservatee.

(C) The proposed conservatee.

(D) The spouse, registered domestic partner, and relatives within the first degree of the proposed conservatee who are required to be named in the petition for appointment of the conservator, unless the court determines that the delivery will harm the
 conservatee.

(E) Any other persons as the court orders.

(b) The court investigator has discretion to release the report required by this section to the public conservator, interested public agencies, and the long-term care ombudsperson.

(c) (1) The report required by this section is confidential and shall be made available only to parties, persons described in paragraph (11) of subdivision (a), persons given notice of the petition who have requested this report or who have appeared in the proceedings, their attorneys, and the court. The court has discretion at any other time to release the report, if it would serve the interests of the conservatee. The clerk of the court shall provide for the
 limitation of the report exclusively to persons entitled to its receipt.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), confidential medical
 information and confidential information from the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) shall be placed in a separate attachment to the report and shall be made available only to the proposed conservatee and the proposed conservatee’s attorney.

(d) This section does not apply to a proposed conservatee who has personally executed the petition for conservatorship, or a proposed conservatee who has nominated their own conservator, if the proposed conservatee attends the hearing.

(e) If the court investigator has performed an investigation within the preceding six months and furnished a report thereon to the court, the court may order, upon good cause shown, that another investigation is not necessary or that a more limited investigation may
 be performed.

(f) An investigation by the court investigator related to a temporary conservatorship also may be a part of the investigation for the general petition for conservatorship, but the court investigator shall make a second visit to the proposed conservatee and the report required by this section shall include the effect of the temporary conservatorship on the proposed conservatee.

(g) The Judicial Council shall, on or before January 1, 2023, update the rules of court and Judicial Council forms as necessary to implement this section.

(h) (1) A superior court shall not be required to perform any duties imposed pursuant to the amendments to this section enacted by Chapter 493 of the Statutes of
 2006 until the Legislature makes an appropriation identified for this purpose.

(2) A superior court shall not be required to perform any duties
 imposed pursuant to the amendments to this section enacted by the measure that added this paragraph until the Legislature makes an appropriation identified for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 420, Sec. 35.   (AB 2960)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1827.

The court shall hear and determine the matter of the establishment of the conservatorship according to the law and procedure relating to the trial of civil actions, including trial by jury if demanded by the proposed conservatee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 17, Sec. 4.2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1827.5.

(a) In the case of any proceeding to establish a limited conservatorship for a person with developmental disabilities, within 30 days after the filing of a petition for limited conservatorship, a proposed limited conservatee, with his or her consent, shall be assessed at a regional center as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4620) of Division 4.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The regional center shall submit a written report of its findings and recommendations to the court.

(b) In the case of any proceeding to establish a general conservatorship for a person with developmental disabilities, the regional center, with the
 consent of the proposed conservatee, may prepare an assessment as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4620) of Division 4.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. If an assessment is prepared, the regional center shall submit its findings and recommendations to the court.

(c) (1) A report prepared under subdivision (a) or (b) shall include a description of the specific areas, nature, and degree of disability of the proposed conservatee or proposed limited conservatee. The findings and recommendations of the regional center are not binding upon the court.

(2) In a proceeding where the petitioner is a provider of board and care, treatment, habilitation, or other services to persons with developmental disabilities or a spouse or employee of a provider, is
 not the natural parent of the proposed conservatee or proposed limited conservatee, and is not a public entity, the regional center shall include a recommendation in its report concerning the suitability of the petitioners to meet the needs of the proposed conservatee or proposed limited conservatee.

(d) At least five days before the hearing on the petition, the regional center shall deliver pursuant to Section 1215 a copy of the report described in subdivision (a) to all of the following:

(1) The proposed limited conservatee.

(2) The attorney, if any, for the proposed limited conservatee.

(3) If the petitioner is not the proposed limited conservatee, the attorney
 for the petitioner or the petitioner if the petitioner does not have an attorney.

(4) Any other persons as the court orders.

(e) The report referred to in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be confidential and shall be made available only to parties listed in subdivision (d) unless the court, in its discretion, determines that the release of the report would serve the interests of the conservatee who is developmentally disabled. The clerk of the court shall limit disclosure of the report exclusively to persons entitled under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 36.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1828.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), before the establishment of a conservatorship of the person or estate, or both, the court shall inform the proposed conservatee of all of the following:

(1) The nature and purpose of the proceeding.

(2) The establishment of a conservatorship is a legal adjudication of the proposed conservatee’s inability to properly provide for the proposed conservatee’s personal needs or to manage the conservatee’s own financial resources, or both, depending on the allegations made and the determinations requested in the petition, and the effect of such an adjudication on the proposed conservatee’s
 basic rights.

(3) (A) The proposed conservatee may be disqualified from voting pursuant to Section 2208 of the Elections Code if the proposed conservatee is incapable of communicating, with or without reasonable accommodations, a desire to participate in the voting process.

(B) The proposed conservatee shall not be disqualified from voting on the basis that the proposed conservatee does, or would need to do, any of the following to complete an affidavit of voter registration:

(i) Signs the affidavit of voter registration with a mark or a cross pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2150 of the Elections Code.

(ii) Signs the affidavit of
 voter registration by means of a signature stamp pursuant to Section 354.5 of the Elections Code.

(iii) Completes the affidavit of voter registration with the assistance of another person pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2150 of the Elections Code.

(iv) Completes the affidavit of voter registration with reasonable accommodations.

(4) The identity of the proposed conservator.

(5) The nature and effect on the proposed conservatee’s basic rights of any order requested under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1870), and in the case of an allegedly developmentally disabled adult, the specific effects of each limitation requested in such order.

(6) The proposed conservatee has the right to oppose the proceeding, to have the matter of the establishment of the conservatorship tried by jury, to be represented by legal counsel if the proposed conservatee so chooses, and to have legal counsel appointed by the court if not otherwise represented by legal counsel.

(b) After the court so informs the proposed conservatee and before the establishment of the conservatorship, the court shall consult the proposed conservatee to determine the proposed conservatee’s opinion concerning all of the following:

(1) The establishment of the conservatorship.

(2) The appointment of the proposed conservator.

(3) Any order requested under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1870), and in the case of an allegedly developmentally disabled adult, of each limitation requested in that order.

(c) This section does not apply where both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The proposed conservatee is absent from the hearing and is not required to attend the hearing under subdivision (a) of Section 1825.

(2) Any showing required by Section 1825 has been made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 420, Sec. 36.   (AB 2960)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1828.5.

(a) At the hearing on the petition for appointment of a limited conservator for an allegedly developmentally disabled adult, the court shall do each of the following:

(1) Inquire into the nature and extent of the general intellectual functioning of the individual alleged to be developmentally disabled.

(2) Evaluate the extent of the impairment of his or her adaptive behavior.

(3) Ascertain his or her capacity to care for himself or herself and his or her property.

(4) Inquire into the qualifications, abilities, and capabilities of the person seeking appointment as limited conservator.

(5) If a report by the regional center, in accordance with Section 1827.5, has not been filed in court because the proposed limited conservatee withheld his or her consent to assessment by the regional center, the court shall determine the reason for withholding such consent.

(b) If the court finds that the proposed limited conservatee possesses the capacity to care for himself or herself and to manage his or her property as a reasonably prudent person, the court shall dismiss the petition for appointment of a limited conservator.

(c) If the court finds that the proposed limited conservatee lacks the capacity to perform some, but not all, of the tasks necessary to provide properly for his or her own personal needs for physical health, food, clothing, or shelter, or to manage his or her own financial resources, the court shall appoint a limited conservator for the person or the estate or the person and the estate.

(d) If the court finds that the proposed limited conservatee lacks the capacity to perform all of the tasks necessary to provide properly for his or her own personal needs for physical health, food, clothing, or shelter, or to manage his or her own financial resources, the court shall appoint either a conservator or a limited conservator for the person or the estate, or the person and the estate.

(e) The court shall define the powers and duties of the limited conservator so as to permit the developmentally disabled adult to care for himself or herself or to manage his or her financial resources commensurate with his or her ability to do so.

(f) Prior to the appointment of a limited conservator for the person or estate or person and estate of a developmentally disabled adult, the court shall inform the proposed limited conservatee of the nature and purpose of the limited conservatorship proceeding, that the appointment of a limited conservator for his or her person or estate or person and estate will result in the transfer of certain rights set forth in the petition and the effect of such transfer, the identity of the person who has been nominated as his or her limited conservator, that he or she has a right to oppose such proceeding, and that he or she has a right to have the matter tried by jury. After communicating such information to the person and prior to the appointment of a limited conservator, the court shall consult the person to determine his or her opinion concerning the appointment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1829.

Any of the following persons may appear at the hearing to support or oppose the petition:

(a) The proposed conservatee.

(b) The spouse or registered domestic partner of the proposed conservatee.

(c) A relative of the proposed conservatee.

(d) Any interested person or friend of the proposed conservatee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 493, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1830.

(a) The order appointing the conservator shall contain, among other things, the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of:

(1) The conservator.

(2) The conservatee’s attorney, if any.

(3) The court investigator, if any.

(b) In the case of a limited conservator for a developmentally disabled adult, any order the court issues shall include the findings of the court specified in Section 1828.5. The order shall specify the powers granted to and duties imposed upon the
 limited conservator, which powers and duties shall not exceed the powers and duties applicable to a conservator under this code. The order shall also specify all of the following:

(1) The properties of the limited conservatee to which the limited conservator is entitled to possession and management, giving a description of the properties that will be sufficient to identify them.

(2) The debts, rentals, wages, or other claims due to the limited conservatee which the limited conservator is entitled to collect, or file suit with respect to, if necessary, and thereafter to possess and manage.

(3) The contractual or other obligations which the limited conservator may incur on behalf of the limited conservatee.

(4) The claims against the limited conservatee which the limited conservator may pay, compromise, or defend, if necessary.

(5) Any other powers, limitations, or duties with respect to the care of the limited conservatee or the management of the property specified in this subdivision by the limited conservator which the court shall specifically and expressly grant.

(c) An information notice of the rights of conservatees shall be attached to the order. The conservator shall deliver pursuant to Section 1215 the order and the attached information notice to the conservatee and the conservatee’s relatives, as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 1821, within 30 days of the issuance of the order. By January 1, 2008, the Judicial
 Council shall develop the notice required by this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 37.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1834.

(a) Before letters are issued in a conservatorship that originates in this state or a conservatorship that is transferred to this state under Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1980), the conservator (other than a trust company or a public conservator) shall file an acknowledgment of receipt of (1) a statement of duties and liabilities of the office of conservator, and (2) a copy of the conservatorship information required under Section 1835. The acknowledgment and the statement shall be in the form prescribed by the Judicial Council.

(b) The court may by local rules require the acknowledgment of receipt to include the conservator’s birth date and driver’s license number, if any,
 provided that the court ensures their confidentiality.

(c) The statement of duties and liabilities prescribed by the Judicial Council shall not supersede the law on which the statement is based.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 7.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1835.

(a) Every superior court shall provide all conservators with written information concerning a conservator’s rights, duties, limitations, and responsibilities under this division.

(b) The information to be provided shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(1) The rights, duties, limitations, and responsibilities of a conservator.

(2) The rights of a conservatee.

(3) How to assess the needs and preferences of the conservatee.

(4) How to use community-based
 services to meet the needs of the conservatee.

(5) How to ensure that the conservatee is provided with the least restrictive possible environment.

(6) The court procedures and processes relevant to conservatorships.

(7) The procedures for inventory and appraisal, and the filing of accounts.

(8) Procedures to petition to terminate or modify the conservatorship.

(9) The conservator’s obligations pursuant to Section 2113.

(c) An information package shall be developed by the Judicial Council, after consultation with the following organizations or individuals:

(1) The California State Association of Public Administrators, Public Guardians, and Public Conservators, or other comparable organizations.

(2) The State Bar.

(3) Individuals or organizations, approved by the Judicial Council, who represent court investigators, specialists with experience in performing assessments and coordinating community-based services, and legal services programs for the elderly.

(d) The failure of any court or any employee or agent thereof, to provide information to a conservator as required by this section does not:

(1) Relieve the conservator of any of the conservator’s duties as required by this division.

(2) Make the court or the employee or agent
 thereof, liable, in either a personal or official capacity, for damages to a conservatee, conservator, the conservatorship of a person or an estate, or any other person or entity.

(e) The information package shall be made available to individual courts. The Judicial Council shall periodically update the information package when changes in the law warrant revision. The revisions shall be provided to individual courts.

(f) To cover the costs of providing the written information required by this section, a court may charge each private conservator a fee of twenty dollars ($20) which shall be distributed to the court in which it was collected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 894, Sec. 8.   (AB 1663)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1835.5.

(a) Within 30 days of the establishment of a conservatorship under this division, and annually thereafter, the superior court shall provide information to a conservatee under its jurisdiction, written in plain language, with a list of the conservatee’s rights within the conservatorship.

(b) The information to be provided shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The name and contact information of the conservator.

(2) A description of the conservatorship, including the rights the conservatee retains under the conservatorship.

(3) The role, duties, and contact information, including name, telephone number, address, and email address, of the court investigator and the court alternatives program.

(4) The person to petition to end or change the conservatorship and contact information for the person to contact to begin that process.

(5) A personalized list of rights that the conservatee retains, even under the conservatorship, including the rights to do all of the following:

(A) Directly receive and control their own salary.

(B) Make or change their will.

(C) Get married.

(D) Receive mail.

(E) Have visits from family and friends.

(F) Have a lawyer.

(G) Ask a judge to change conservators.

(H) Ask a judge to end the conservatorship.

(I) Vote, unless expressly withheld by the court.

(J) Control personal spending money if a judge permits an allowance to be paid directly to the conservatee.

(K) Make their own health care decisions.

(L) Enter into business transactions to provide for the conservatee’s basic needs and those of their children.

(M) Participate in other activities the court allows when the conservator is appointed, or when the court order later grants that right at the conservatee’s request.

(6) The personalized list of rights in paragraph (5) shall state which rights, if any, were expressly withheld by the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 894, Sec. 9.   (AB 1663)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1836.

(a) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the Judicial Council shall establish a conservatorship alternatives program within each self-help center in every state Superior Court.

(b) The purposes of the conservatorship alternatives program are:

(1) To provide information relating to less restrictive alternatives to conservatorship, including, but not limited to, supported decisionmaking agreements, as defined in Section 21001 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to interested individuals.

(2) To educate interested individuals on less restrictive alternatives to conservatorship that may be appropriate, and to provide
 assistance in considering and implementing those alternatives.

(c) Each court’s conservatorship alternatives program shall include staff who provide information and resources to interested individuals about less restrictive alternatives to conservatorship.

(d) The conservatorship alternatives program shall operate as follows:

(1) Any interested individual who contacts a superior court self-help center to inquire about conservatorship proceedings or to request documents to petition for a conservatorship shall be advised of the conservatorship alternatives program.

(2) The conservatorship alternatives program shall be a component of each superior court’s self-help center.

(3) Conservatorship
 alternatives program staff shall be trained in less restrictive alternatives to conservatorship and shall be available to meet, through in-person or remote means, with interested individuals to provide education and resources on supported decisionmaking agreements and other less restrictive alternatives to conservatorship, and to provide resources to assist people who wish to implement or establish those alternatives.

(4) Conservatorship alternatives program staff shall be able to provide the following to interested individuals: 

(A) Practical resources, information, and documents to establish and implement alternatives to conservatorship, including powers of attorney, advance health care directives, and supported decisionmaking agreements.

(B) Technical support and education on these alternatives, including
 assistance in filling out any associated paperwork and in understanding these alternatives.

(5) Interactions or communication with the CAP Program shall not be used as evidence of incapacity or introduced for any other reason in a conservatorship proceeding under this division unless introduced by the conservatee or proposed conservatee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 894, Sec. 10.   (AB 1663)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Special Provisions Applicable Where Proposed Conservatee Is an Absentee [1840. - 1844.]

1840.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, a conservator for an absentee (Section 1403) shall be appointed as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 1820) of this chapter or Article 3 (commencing with Section 2001) of Chapter 8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 8.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1841.

In addition to the other required contents of the petition, if the proposed conservatee is an absentee:

(a) The petition, and any notice required by Section 1822 or 2002, or any other law, shall set forth the last known military rank or grade and the social security account number of the proposed conservatee.

(b) The petition shall state whether the absentee’s spouse has commenced any action or proceeding against the absentee for judicial or legal separation, dissolution of marriage, annulment, or adjudication of nullity of their marriage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 9.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1842.

In addition to the persons and entities to whom notice of hearing is required under Section 1822 or 2002, if the proposed conservatee is an absentee, a copy of the petition and notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 at least 15 days before the hearing to the secretary concerned or to the head of the United States department or agency concerned, as the case may be. In that case, notice shall also be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the hearing will be held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 38.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1843.

(a) No citation is required under Section 1823 to the proposed conservatee if the proposed conservatee is an absentee.

(b) No notice is required under Section 2002 to the proposed conservatee if the proposed conservatee is an absentee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 11.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1844.

(a) In a proceeding to appoint a conservator for an absentee under Article 3 (commencing with Section 1820) of this chapter or Article 3 (commencing with Section 2001) of Chapter 8, an official written report or record complying with Section 1283 of the Evidence Code that a proposed conservatee is an absentee shall be received as evidence of that fact and the court shall not determine the status of the proposed conservatee inconsistent with the status determined as shown by the written report or record.

(b) The inability of the proposed conservatee to attend the hearing is established by the official written report or record referred to in subdivision
 (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 12.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Special Provisions Applicable Where Proposed Conservatee Is a Missing Person [1845. - 1849.5.]

1845.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this article, a conservator of the estate of a person who is missing and whose whereabouts is unknown shall be appointed as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 1820) of this chapter or Article 3 (commencing with Section 2001) of Chapter 8.

(b) This article does not apply where the proposed conservatee is an absentee as defined in Section 1403.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 13.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1846.

In addition to the other required contents of the petition, if the proposed conservatee is a person who is missing and whose whereabouts is unknown, the petition shall state all of the following:

(a) The proposed conservatee owns or is entitled to the possession of real or personal property located in this state. In a proceeding to transfer a conservatorship of a missing person to this state under Article 3 (commencing with Section 2001) of Chapter 8, this requirement is also satisfied if the petition states that the proposed conservatee owns or is entitled to the possession of personal property that is to be relocated to this state upon approval of the transfer.

(b) The time and circumstance of the person’s disappearance and that the missing person has not been heard from by the persons most likely to hear (naming them and their relationship to the missing person) since the time of disappearance and that the whereabouts of the missing person is unknown to those persons and to the petitioner.

(c) The last known residence of the missing person.

(d) A description of any search or inquiry made concerning the whereabouts of the missing person.

(e) A description of the estate of the proposed conservatee which requires attention, supervision, and care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 14.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1847.

In addition to the persons and entities to whom notice of hearing is required under Section 1822 or 2002, if the proposed conservatee is a person who is missing and whose whereabouts is unknown:

(a) A copy of the petition for appointment of a conservator and notice of the time and place of the hearing on the petition shall be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 at least 15 days before the hearing to the proposed conservatee at the last known address of the proposed conservatee.

(b) Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall also be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation in the
 county in which the proposed conservatee was last known to reside if the proposed
 conservatee’s last known address is in this state.

(c) Pursuant to Section 1202, the court may require that further or additional notice of the hearing be given.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 39.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1848.

(a) In a proceeding under Article 3 (commencing with Section 1820) to appoint a conservator of the estate of a person who is missing and whose whereabouts is unknown, the following acts are not required:

(1) Issuance of a citation to the proposed conservatee pursuant to Section 1823.

(2) Service of a citation and petition pursuant to Section 1824.

(3) Production of the proposed conservatee at the hearing pursuant to Section 1825.

(4) Performance of the duties of the court investigator pursuant
 to Section 1826.

(5) Performance of any other act that depends upon knowledge of the location of the proposed conservatee.

(b) In a proceeding to transfer a conservatorship of a missing person to this state under Article 3 (commencing with Section 2001) of Chapter 8, the following acts are not required:

(1) Notice to the proposed conservatee pursuant to Section 2002.

(2) Production of the proposed conservatee at the hearings pursuant to Section 2002.

(3) Performance of the duties of the court investigator pursuant to Section 1851.1.

(4) Performance of any other act that depends upon knowledge of the location of the proposed
 conservatee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 16.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1849.

A conservator of the estate of a person who is missing and whose whereabouts is unknown may be appointed only if the court finds all of the following:

(a) The proposed conservatee owns or is entitled to the possession of real or personal property located in this state. In a proceeding to transfer a conservatorship of a missing person to this state under Article 3 (commencing with Section 2001) of Chapter 8, this requirement is also satisfied if the court finds that the proposed conservatee owns or is entitled to the possession of personal property that is to be relocated to this state upon approval of the transfer.

(b) The proposed
 conservatee remains missing and his or her whereabouts remains unknown.

(c) The estate of the proposed conservatee requires attention, supervision, and care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 17.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1849.5.

(a) A petition may be filed under this article regardless of when the proposed conservatee became missing or how long the proposed conservatee has been missing.

(b) If a trustee was appointed pursuant to former Section 262, repealed by Chapter 201 of the Statutes of 1983, the provisions of former Sections 260 to 272, inclusive, repealed by Chapter 201 of the Statutes of 1983, continue to apply to the case after December 31, 1983, unless, upon a petition filed under this article after December 31, 1983, the trustee is replaced by a conservator.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Periodic Review of Conservatorship [1850. - 1853.]

1850.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (e), each conservatorship established pursuant to this part shall be reviewed by the court as follows:

(1) Six months after the initial appointment of the conservator, the court investigator shall visit the conservatee, conduct an investigation as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 1851, and report to the court regarding the appropriateness of the conservatorship and whether the conservator is acting in the best interests of the conservatee regarding the conservatee’s placement, quality of care, including physical and mental health treatment, and finances. In response to the investigator’s report, the court may take appropriate action including, but not limited to, ordering a hearing or ordering the conservator to submit an
 accounting pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2620.

(2) One year after the initial appointment of the conservator and annually thereafter, the court investigator shall, as provided in Section 1851, visit the conservatee, conduct an investigation, including, when possible, discussing with the conservatee less restrictive alternatives to conservatorship as set forth in Section 1800.3, and report the findings of the investigation to the court, including whether the conservator or conservatee wishes to modify or terminate the conservatorship and whether less restrictive alternatives could be tried. On receipt of the investigator’s report, the court shall, if indicated by the report, consider promptly terminating or modifying the conservatorship at a hearing pursuant to Section 1860.5 or 1863 and take any other appropriate action.

(b) At any time, the court may, on its own motion
 or upon request by any interested person, take appropriate action including, but not limited to, ordering a review of the conservatorship at a noticed hearing or ordering the conservator to submit an accounting pursuant to Section 2620.

(c) Notice of a review hearing pursuant to this section shall be given to the persons, for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(d) This chapter does not apply to either of the following:

(1) A conservatorship for an absentee as defined in Section 1403.

(2) A conservatorship of the estate for a nonresident of this state where the conservatee is not present in this state.

(e) (1) A
 superior court shall not be required to perform any duties imposed pursuant to the amendments to this section enacted by Chapter 493 of the Statutes of 2006 until the Legislature makes an appropriation identified for this purpose.

(2) A superior court shall not be required to perform any duties imposed pursuant to the measure that added this paragraph until the Legislature makes an appropriation identified for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 894, Sec. 11.   (AB 1663)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1850.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 1850, each limited conservatorship for a developmentally disabled adult, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 1801, shall be reviewed by the court one year after the appointment of the conservator and biennially thereafter.

(b) The court may, on its own motion or upon request by any interested person, take appropriate action, including, but not limited to, ordering a review of the limited conservatorship at a noticed hearing, at any time.

(c) At any review pursuant to this section, the court shall consider terminating the limited
 conservatorship, as provided in Section 1860.5. 

(d) Notice of a review hearing pursuant to this section shall be given to the persons, for the period and in the manner provided in subdivision (d) of Section 1860.5.
